Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-452
License; disciplinary actions; rights of licensee.

Within fifteen days after service of a notice under section 71-451, an applicant or a licensee shall notify the director in writing that the applicant or licensee (1) desires to contest the notice and request an informal conference with a representative of the department in person or by other means at the request of the applicant or licensee, (2) desires to contest the notice and request an informal conference with a representative peer review organization with which the department has contracted, (3) desires to contest the notice and request a hearing, or (4) does not contest the notice. If the director does not receive such notification within such fifteen-day period, the action of the department shall be final.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 52;

Laws 2007, LB203, § 5.